Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,235
Rules and regulations.

The Nebraska Emergency Management Agency shall as necessary adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out its responsibilities under the Nebraska Emergency Planning and Community Right to Know Act. The Environmental Quality Council shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment to carry out its responsibilities under the act.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 45;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 150;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 438.